Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3515
Criminal justice agency; criminal history record information; maintain.

Each criminal justice agency shall maintain complete and accurate criminal history record information with regard to the actions taken by the agency.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 15.